Vermont, session 2025-2026, H382.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act may be cited as “The Vermont Justice Transparency Act.”
Sec. 2. 4 V.S.A. § 42 is added to read:
§ 42. DATA REPORTING
(a)(1) Beginning on August 1, 2028 and quarterly thereafter, the Judiciary
shall issue a report on all of the following data from the previous year relating
to:
VT LEG #380830 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.382
2025 Page 2 of 7
(A) pretrial release determination for individuals, including the
amount of bail set and nonmonetary conditions of release, if any;
(B) sentence type and length imposed by the court, including
minimum and maximum sentence imposed, and conditions of probation or
other supervision or resolution; and
(C) the number of cases diverted from prosecution.
(2) All data required by subdivision (1) of this subsection shall identify
the county of the proceeding, the presiding judge, the charge or charges, and
the individual’s age, race, gender, and state of last residence.
(b) The Judiciary shall post the report electronically on its website in a
manner that is easily understandable and accessible to the public.
Sec. 3. 20 V.S.A. § 2057 is amended to read:
§ 2057. INFORMATION
(a) From time to time but at least annually, the center Center shall publish
information relating to criminal activity, arrests, convictions, and such other
information as the commissioner Commissioner deems relevant. At a
minimum, the Center shall issue a report on arrest data from each State,
county, and municipal law enforcement agency from the previous year relating
to:
(1) the age, race, gender, and state of residence of individuals who
are arrested;
VT LEG #380830 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.382
2025 Page 3 of 7
(2) reported incidents of use of force, identified by type of force
used;
(3) arrests categorized by legal basis for the arrest; and
(4) results of searches conducted pursuant to arrests.
(b) Each State, county, and municipal law enforcement agency shall
provide the information required in subsection (a) of this section to the Center
in a time frame and manner established by the Center.
Sec. 4. 24 V.S.A. § 368 is added to read:
§ 368. REPORTING DATA
(a) Beginning on January 31, 2026 and annually thereafter, the Department
of State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs shall issue a report consisting of data from
each of the State’s Attorneys on the following:
(1) the number and percentage of cases a State’s Attorney declines to
prosecute; the rationale for declining to prosecute in each instance; the alleged
criminal violation; and the age, race, gender, and state of last residence of the
individual referred for prosecution;
(2) the number and percentage of cases that result in accepted pleas to
lesser charges, identified by original charge and charge pled to by the
individual, and the age, race, gender, and state of last residence of the
individual;
VT LEG #380830 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.382
2025 Page 4 of 7
(3) the number and percentage of cases in which a State’s Attorney
sought the maximum sentence, identified by the charge, and the age, race,
gender, and state of last residence of the individual;
(4) the number and percentage of cases recommended by a State’s
Attorney for the individual to be released on the individual’s own recognizance
and cash bail or no bail, identified by charge; bail amount; and the age, race,
gender, and state of last residence of the individual; and
(5) the number and percentage of cases in which a State’s Attorney
sought an alternative to incarceration; the types of alternatives chosen; the
charges in each case in which an alternative was sought; and the age, race,
gender, and state of last residence of the individual.
(b) Each State’s Attorney shall provide the information required in
subsection (a) of this section to the Center in a time frame and manner
established by the Center.
(c) The Department shall post the reports created electronically in a manner
that is accessible to the public on the Department’s website.
Sec 5. 28 V.S.A. § 123 is added to read:
§ 123. REPORTING DATA
(a) Beginning on August 5, 2026, and on the first Monday of every month
thereafter, the Department shall issue a report on Vermont’s incarcerated
VT LEG #380830 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.382
2025 Page 5 of 7
population on the provisions identified in subdivisions (1)–(2) of this
subsection.
(1) Inmate data as follows:
(A) The number and characteristics of the inmate population. Data
shall include offenses; length of longest sentence; and an inmate’s age, race,
gender, county of sentencing, and state of last residence.
(B) The number and percentage of inmates held past their minimum
release date. Data shall include offenses and the inmate’s age, race, gender,
state of last residence and the reason why the inmate was held beyond the
minimum release date.
(C) The number and percentage of inmates who have been held in
solitary confinement in the previous month and the number of days of that
confinement. Data shall include the inmate’s age, race, and gender; the reason
for segregation; and whether or not the inmate is classified as having a serious
functional impairment.
(D) The number and percentage of inmates who have screened
positive for opioid use disorder, have requested medication for opioid use
disorder, and are receiving such medication. Data shall include the inmate’s
age, race, gender, county of sentencing, and state of last residence.
(2) Detainee data as follows:
VT LEG #380830 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.382
2025 Page 6 of 7
(A) A monthly update of Vermont’s detainee population. The update
shall include data on offenses charged; the county where charges are filed; the
length of detention if the detainee is held for more than one day; bail amount;
and the inmate’s age, race, gender, and state of last residence.
(B) The number and percentage of detainees who have screened
positive for opioid use disorder, who have requested medication-assisted
treatment (MAT), and who are receiving MAT. Data shall include the county
where charges are filed and the inmate’s age, race, gender, and state of last
residence.
(b) Beginning on January 31, 2026, and annually thereafter, the
Department shall issue a report on the incarcerated population as follows:
(1) Data from the previous year on the total number of people
incarcerated. Data shall include offenses and length of longest sentence by the
inmate’s age, race, gender, county of sentencing, and state of last residence.
(2) Data from the previous year on the 12 most frequent charges. Data
shall include the offenses and the inmate’s age, race, gender, county of
sentencing, and state of last residence.
(3) Data from the previous year on mean and median sentence length for
the 12 most frequent charges. Data shall include the offenses and the inmate’s
age, race, gender, county of sentencing, and state of last residence.
VT LEG #380830 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.382
2025 Page 7 of 7
(4) Data from the previous year on revocation of probation, parole,
furlough, or other community supervision. Data shall include the original
offenses; violations; the county where the person was supervised and the
violation occurred; whether the person was reincarcerated; and the person’s
age, race, gender, and state of last residence.
(5) Data on the recidivism rate, as defined in 28 V.S.A. § 4, identified
by the new offense charged and the county in which it was charged and the
person’s age, race, and gender.
(6) Data from the previous year on the number and percentage of
inmates who have been screened for developmental disabilities, mental health
conditions, and substance use disorders.
(c) The Department shall post the report electronically on its website in a
manner that is easily understandable and accessible to the public.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380830 v.1